Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-295
Violations; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to (1) intentionally and without lawful authority cut, break, tap, or make connection with any telegraph or telephone line, wire, cable, or instrument or electronic, mechanical, or other device or read or copy in any unauthorized manner any message, communication, or report passing over it, in this state, (2) intentionally and without lawful authority prevent, obstruct, or delay, by any means or contrivance whatsoever, the sending, transmission, conveyance, or delivery in this state of any authorized message, communication, or report by or through any telegraph or telephone line, wire, or cable under the control of any telegraph or telephone company doing business in this state, (3) aid, agree with, employ, or conspire with any person or persons to unlawfully do or perform, or cause to be done, any of the acts described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, or (4) occupy, use a line, or knowingly permit another to occupy, use a line, room, table, establishment, or apparatus to unlawfully do or cause to be done any of the acts described in this section. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1969, c. 854, § 7, p. 3219;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 330;

Laws 1988, LB 899, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-707;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 157.